Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 5. Imprisonment for debt.

No person shall be imprisoned for debt, except in cases of fraud.

Cross references. —

As to seizure of persons for purpose of securing satisfaction of judgments, see Rule 64, W.R.C.P.

Prohibition not implicated for contempt order in domestic case. —

In a contempt proceeding, a district court's order that required imprisonment if a mother did not make certain payments arising from a domestic proceeding did not implicate the prohibition on debt imprisonment because the order to pay money arose from a status obligation. GGV v. JLR, 2005 WY 14, 105 P.3d 474,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2005).

Imprisonment for nonpayment of a fine

is not an imprisonment for debt. In re MacDonald, 4 Wyo. 150, 33 P. 18,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1893).

Punishment for fraud by check not violative of section. —

Since a criminal intent to deceitfully issue an insufficient funds check is an essential element of the crime of fraud by check, prohibited by §

6-3-702

, that statutory section does not violate this constitutional section. State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982).

No imprisonment absent capacity to pay. —

A convicted person cannot be subjected to revocation of probation for noncompliance with restitution unless, in accord with the statutes, a plan has been developed which demonstrates the required criteria, including capacity to pay. In the absence of capacity to pay with reasonable effort made, imprisonment for debt occurs in contravention of this section. Seaton v. State, 811 P.2d 276,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited

in

State v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 192, 53 P.2d 13,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1935).

Stated in

Nicodemus v. State, 2017 WY 34, 392 P.3d 408,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Necessity of conviction of offense associated with property seized in order to support forfeiture of property to state or local authorities, 38 ALR4th 515.